src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX X 0 маётганидадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганидамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганида-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлар [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлар-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлармикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлар-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларни [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларними [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнидир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларни-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнидир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнимикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларни-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнинг [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнингми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнингдир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнинг-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнингдир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнингмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларнинг-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларга [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларгами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларгадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларга-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларгадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларгамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларга-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларданми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардандир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардан-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардандир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларданмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардан-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларда [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларда-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлардамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларда-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларим [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларим-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлариммикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларим-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимни [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимними [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнидир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимни-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнидир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнимикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимни-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнинг [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнингми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнингдир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнинг-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнингдир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнингмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимнинг-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимга [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимгами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимгадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимга-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимгадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимгамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимга-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимданми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдандир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдан-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдандир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимданмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдан-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимда [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимда-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимдамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимда-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиз [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиз-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиз-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизни [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизними [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнидир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизни-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнидир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнимикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизни-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнинг [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнингми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнингдир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнинг-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнингдир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнингмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизнинг-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизга [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизгами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизгадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизга-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизгадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизгамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизга-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизданми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздандир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздан-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздандир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизданмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздан-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизда [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизда-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимиздамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимизда-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинг [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинг-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинг-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингни [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингними [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнидир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингни-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнидир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнимикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингни-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнинг [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнингми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнингдир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнинг-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнингдир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнингмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингнинг-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингга [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинггами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинггадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингга-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинггадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинггамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингга-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингданми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдандир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдан-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдандир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингданмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдан-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингда [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингда-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингдамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингда-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиз [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиз-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиз-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизни [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизними [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнидир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизни-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнидир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнимикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизни-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнинг [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнингми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнингдир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнинг-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнингдир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнингмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнинг-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизга [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизгами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизгадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизга-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизгадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизгамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизга-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизданми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздандир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздан-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздандир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизданмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздан-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизда [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизда-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизда-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлари [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларими [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлари-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларимикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлари-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларини [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлариними [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинидир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларини-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинидир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинимикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларини-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларининг [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинингми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинингдир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларининг-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинингдир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларинингмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларининг-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларига [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларигами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларигадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларига-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларигадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларигамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларига-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлариданми [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидандир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидан-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидандир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганлариданмикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидан-ку [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларида [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидами [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидадир [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларида-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидадир-да [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларидамикан [й]
SFX X 0 маётганларида-ку [й]
SFX X 0 гунча .
SFX X 0 гунчами .
SFX X 0 гунчадир .
SFX X 0 гунча-да .
SFX X 0 гунчадир-да .
SFX X 0 гунчамикан .
SFX X 0 гунча-ку .
SFX X 0 гунга .
