src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
авайлан/X
автоматлаштирил/X
адашиб-улоқ/X
ажра/X
азоблантир/X
айирбошлат/X
аймоқилаш/X
айтиштир/X
аксир/X
алаксира/X
алда/X
алишиш/X
алоҳидалан/X
англатил/X
аниқлаштирил/X
аралашавер/X
арзонлаштирил/X
арралаш/X
асабийлантир/X
асран/X
атан/X
ахтар/X
аччиқла/X
бағишлат/X
баёвлаш/X
бақирлат/X
балчиқлан/X
барқарорлаш/X
басталан/X
баҳслаштир/X
бежолан/X
безаш/X
бекиниш/X
белгилан/X
беравер/X
бесабрлан/X
бетоблан/X
бешовлаш/X
бижирла/X
бил/X
билиқтир/X
бирик/X
битиш/X
бияла/X
бозилла/X
боқтирил/X
боплан/X
босириқ/X
ботқиз/X
бошлатқиз/X
бўғизлан/X
бўғозлан/X
буздиртир/X
бўйлан/X
букиштир/X
бўлаклат/X
бўлдир/X
бўра/X
буржуйлаш/X
бўрла/X
бўрттирил/X
бутлан/X
бўшанқира/X
буюртирил/X
вағирлаш/X
вайсайвер/X
вангвангла/X
варқира/X
вёрсткала/X
вилкала/X
возилла/X
вульгарлаштир/X
галала/X
гандираклаш/X
гаплаштир/X
гердайтир/X
гизиллат/X
группала/X
гувурлат/X
гумбурла/X
гупурлат/X
гурунглаш/X
ғажит/X
ғарамлаттир/X
ғижимлан/X
ғилдира/X
ғингшит/X
ғитиллат/X
ғувурла/X
ғўлдира/X
давола/X
дазмолла/X
далилла/X
даражалан/X
даррала/X
де/X
декретлаштир/X
деформацияла/X
дикирла/X
димлан/X
дискуссиялаш/X
додлаш/X
драмалаштир/X
дукиллат/X
дўлоблаш/X
дўпиллат/X
дўрдайтир/X
ёввойилаш/X
ёғавер/X
едирил/X
ёзил/X
ейиш/X
ёқтирғиз/X
елимла/X
елпилла/X
ёмонлан/X
енгиллаштир/X
ёпиниш/X
ёрил/X
ерпарчинла/X
етиштир/X
ётоқчила/X
ечтир/X
жавдират/X
жадаллаштир/X
жамлаттир/X
жасоратлан/X
жиддийлаштир/X
жилвира/X
жиловлат/X
жимит/X
жирингла/X
жойлантир/X
жуволдизла/X
жўнаттир/X
жўш/X
замазкалат/X
запаслан/X
захирала/X
зиёдалан/X
зиралат/X
зичлаштир/X
зорланиш/X
зўриқтирил/X
идеаллаштирил/X
изиллат/X
ийдирт/X
илакиш/X
илдамлаштир/X
илиқлан/X
имзола/X
инвестицияла/X
индаш/X
инжи/X
инсонийлаштир/X
интилтир/X
ирғиттир/X
исботлан/X
искаш/X
истаттир/X
ифодала/X
иҳраш/X
ичтир/X
ишла/X
ишорала/X
йиғдирил/X
йиқ/X
йирил/X
йўқсиллаштир/X
кавлан/X
камай/X
картилла/X
кекир/X
кепакла/X
кетил/X
кийгиздир/X
киркиллаш/X
классификациялан/X
колхозлаш/X
координациялаштир/X
кўзкўзла/X
кўклат/X
кўмиш/X
кўплаш/X
курмаклат/X
кучалтир/X
қағиллат/X
қайғулан/X
қайтарил/X
қалдират/X
қаноатсизлан/X
қартай/X
қаттиқла/X
қизартир/X
қийқиртир/X
қиличла/X
қирилтир/X
қистат/X
қовжира/X
қолдирил/X
қоп/X
қотиш/X
қувноқлан/X
қуйқала/X
қўлтиқлат/X
қўнқайтир/X
қўрқ/X
қутблан/X
қуюқлан/X
лаънатла/X
лоғарлан/X
лўкиллат/X
мажолсизлантирил/X
малакалантир/X
маҳкамлантир/X
метрла/X
мизғи/X
минғирлайвер/X
можаролаш/X
муайянлаштир/X
мўйсафидлаш/X
мумла/X
мутакаббирлаш/X
найниқлан/X
нафислаштир/X
ниқлан/X
нозиклаштир/X
нотинчлан/X
обдира/X
овунтириш/X
одимла/X
оксидла/X
олдинлаш/X
омихтала/X
орзулан/X
осойишталан/X
очиқлаштир/X
ошириш/X
панғиллат/X
парчинлат/X
пашшала/X
пилпилла/X
пихилла/X
пишпишла/X
порала/X
пулдорлан/X
равнақлан/X
рангсизлан/X
рейкала/X
руслаштир/X
сайрат/X
сандирангла/X
саранжомлаштир/X
саҳналаштирил/X
селпин/X
сертификатлаштир/X
сийғала/X
сиқимлаш/X
силосла/X
синчикла/X
сирпаниш/X
соғайт/X
солин/X
сочтир/X
суғуриш/X
сўйдир/X
сулай/X
супуртир/X
суриштир/X
сустлаштирил/X
таассуфлан/X
такаббурлаш/X
тақаш/X
талвасалан/X
танбеҳла/X
тапирлат/X
тарвақайла/X
тасвирла/X
тахлан/X
ташлаёз/X
таянтир/X
тезлан/X
тентаклан/X
тердир/X
тиғла/X
тик/X
тиқиштирил/X
тимирскилат/X
тинчлат/X
тириллат/X
тисар/X
тишлаш/X
тойлан/X
топ/X
тортиниш/X
тўгаракла/X
тўдала/X
тузлат/X
тўктирил/X
тўлаттир/X
тумовлан/X
тўпилла/X
туркийла/X
тусла/X
тутунла/X
тушунтириш/X
ўғирлан/X
ўзгарил/X
ўй/X
ўйлантир/X
ўксизлан/X
ўқчи/X
ўлтириш/X
унаттир/X
унификацияла/X
ўрат/X
уришиш/X
уруштир/X
ўтиш/X
ўтроқлаш/X
учириш/X
ушла/X
фаранглаш/X
функциялаштир/X
хасислаш/X
хиллаштирил/X
хлоритлаш/X
хотирлаш/X
хўрсин/X
ҳаёсизлан/X
ҳақоратлан/X
ҳарсиллат/X
ҳимарил/X
ҳопиттир/X
ҳур/X
чавақлан/X
чайнаттир/X
чақчайиш/X
чамалан/X
чаплат/X
чаҳчаҳла/X
чертиш/X
чиздир/X
чиқар/X
чимчилан/X
чирмал/X
чоқла/X
чуваштир/X
чўзилиш/X
чўқморла/X
чўмичла/X
чўччай/X
шақилла/X
шанқилла/X
шатаклаш/X
шикастла/X
шимартир/X
ширқилла/X
шовурлаш/X
штрихла/X
шўрлаш/X
эзғила/X
электрлан/X
эндир/X
эрсира/X
эъзозла/X
юзлан/X
юлқин/X
юпқар/X
яйла/X
яланси/X
ямал/X
ярат/X
яссилан/X
